Oklahoma, session 2026, SB953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Election


Integrity Enforcement Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 16-105.1 of Title 26, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. District attorneys in this state are hereby authorized


to initiate civil actions on behalf of voters within their

Req. No. 1392 Page 1


respective judicial districts in cases where election irregularities


or fraud are alleged to have occurred.


2. District attorneys shall have standing to bring actions in


district court to:


a. investigate and address violations of election laws,


including, but not limited to, voter fraud, ballot


tampering, unlawful voting practices, and breaches of


voting machine security,


b. seek injunctive relief to prevent further violations


or irregularities, and


c. pursue restitution or other remedies as deemed


appropriate by the court to protect the rights of


voters.


B. 1. District attorneys may request access to relevant


election records and data from the State Election Board and county


election boards to support investigations and litigation efforts.


2. All records obtained for investigation shall remain


confidential except as required by law or court order.


3. Reports on litigation outcomes must be submitted annually to


the Oklahoma State Election Board for review and public record.


C. 1. Any action initiated under this act must receive prior


approval from the district court in the judicial district where the


alleged irregularity occurred. The court shall assess whether the



Req. No. 1392 Page 2


allegations present a prima facie case of election fraud or


irregularity.


2. District attorneys shall not file lawsuits frivolously.


3. Penalties for repeated misuse of this authority include


censure, suspension, or removal under applicable state law.


D. The Secretary of the State Election Board shall be


authorized to promulgate rules necessary to facilitate the


implementation of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1392 TEK 1/19/2025 5:46:38 AM



















Req. No. 1392 Page 3